Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216I.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Setbacks; solar energy generating systems. new text end new text begin A permit must not be granted under this chapter to construct a solar energy generating system that is located within three-quarters of a mile of: new text end new text begin (1) a state park, as defined in section 86A.05, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) a state wildlife management area, as defined in section 86A.05, subdivision 8; or new text end new text begin (3) a county park. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to all solar energy generating systems applying for a site permit under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 216I, on or after that date. new text end